Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 647 N 1
SFX 647 0 DirectoryRemove .

SFX 648 N 1
SFX 648 0 Disable .

SFX 649 N 1
SFX 649 0 DiscreteStep .

SFX 650 N 1
SFX 650 0 Disjoint .

SFX 651 N 1
SFX 651 0 DisjointUnion .

SFX 652 N 1
SFX 652 0 Dispatcher .

SFX 653 N 1
SFX 653 0 Display .

SFX 654 N 1
SFX 654 0 DisplayCache .

SFX 655 N 1
SFX 655 0 DisplayFunction .

SFX 656 N 1
SFX 656 0 distance .

SFX 657 N 1
SFX 657 0 Distance .

SFX 658 N 1
SFX 658 0 DistanceFunction .

SFX 659 N 1
SFX 659 0 DistanceMatrix .

SFX 660 N 1
SFX 660 0 DistanceTransform .

SFX 661 N 1
SFX 661 0 Distinct .

SFX 662 N 1
SFX 662 0 DistinctBy .

SFX 663 N 1
SFX 663 0 distributed .

SFX 664 N 1
SFX 664 0 distribution .

SFX 665 N 1
SFX 665 0 Distribution .

SFX 666 N 1
SFX 666 0 DistributionParameters .

SFX 667 N 1
SFX 667 0 Division .

SFX 668 N 1
SFX 668 0 Divisions .

SFX 669 N 1
SFX 669 0 dListPlot .

SFX 670 N 1
SFX 670 0 dMousePosition .

SFX 671 N 1
SFX 671 0 DN .

SFX 672 N 1
SFX 672 0 dObject .

SFX 673 N 1
SFX 673 0 Domain .

SFX 674 N 1
SFX 674 0 Dot .

SFX 675 N 1
SFX 675 0 DoubleVerticalBar .

SFX 676 N 1
SFX 676 0 DownArrow .

SFX 677 N 1
SFX 677 0 Download .

SFX 678 N 1
SFX 678 0 DownloadSubmit .

SFX 679 N 1
SFX 679 0 DownTeeVector .

SFX 680 N 1
SFX 680 0 DownVector .

SFX 681 N 1
SFX 681 0 DownVectorBar .

SFX 682 N 1
SFX 682 0 dPlot .

SFX 683 N 1
SFX 683 0 dra .

SFX 684 N 1
SFX 684 0 dResiduals .

SFX 685 N 1
SFX 685 0 dron .

SFX 686 N 1
SFX 686 0 drons .

SFX 687 N 1
SFX 687 0 Drop .

SFX 688 N 1
SFX 688 0 DropFrom .

SFX 689 N 1
SFX 689 0 DS .

SFX 690 N 1
SFX 690 0 DST .

SFX 691 N 1
SFX 691 0 DSTMatrix .

SFX 692 N 1
SFX 692 0 dstrand .

SFX 693 N 1
SFX 693 0 dström .

SFX 694 N 1
SFX 694 0 dTime .

SFX 695 N 1
SFX 695 0 Due .

SFX 696 N 1
SFX 696 0 dUnit .

SFX 697 N 1
SFX 697 0 DuplicateCellStyle .

SFX 698 N 1
SFX 698 0 Duration .

SFX 699 N 1
SFX 699 0 During .

SFX 700 N 1
SFX 700 0 DXF .

SFX 701 N 1
SFX 701 0 dy .

SFX 702 N 1
SFX 702 0 DynamicExpression .

SFX 703 N 1
SFX 703 0 e .

SFX 704 N 1
SFX 704 0 E .

SFX 705 N 1
SFX 705 0 E1 .

SFX 706 N 1
SFX 706 0 E2 .

SFX 707 N 1
SFX 707 0 E3 .

SFX 708 N 1
SFX 708 0 eanDistance .

SFX 709 N 1
SFX 709 0 easure .

SFX 710 N 1
SFX 710 0 eavy .

SFX 711 N 1
SFX 711 0 ebook .

SFX 712 N 1
SFX 712 0 ebookApply .

SFX 713 N 1
SFX 713 0 ebookAutoSave .

SFX 714 N 1
SFX 714 0 ebookClose .

SFX 715 N 1
SFX 715 0 ebookConvert .

SFX 716 N 1
SFX 716 0 ebookConvertSettings .

SFX 717 N 1
SFX 717 0 ebookCreate .

SFX 718 N 1
SFX 718 0 ebookCreateReturnObject .

SFX 719 N 1
SFX 719 0 ebookDefault .

SFX 720 N 1
SFX 720 0 ebookDelete .

SFX 721 N 1
SFX 721 0 ebookDirectory .

SFX 722 N 1
SFX 722 0 ebookDynamicExpression .

SFX 723 N 1
SFX 723 0 ebookEvaluate .

SFX 724 N 1
SFX 724 0 ebookEventActions .

SFX 725 N 1
SFX 725 0 ebookFileName .

SFX 726 N 1
SFX 726 0 ebookFind .

SFX 727 N 1
SFX 727 0 ebookFindReturnObject .

SFX 728 N 1
SFX 728 0 ebookGet .

SFX 729 N 1
SFX 729 0 ebookGetLayoutInformationPacket .

SFX 730 N 1
SFX 730 0 ebookGetMisspellingsPacket .

SFX 731 N 1
SFX 731 0 ebookImport .

SFX 732 N 1
SFX 732 0 ebookInformation .

SFX 733 N 1
SFX 733 0 ebookInterfaceObject .

SFX 734 N 1
SFX 734 0 ebookLocate .

SFX 735 N 1
SFX 735 0 ebookObject .

SFX 736 N 1
SFX 736 0 ebookOpen .

SFX 737 N 1
SFX 737 0 ebookOpenReturnObject .

SFX 738 N 1
SFX 738 0 ebookPath .

SFX 739 N 1
SFX 739 0 ebookPrint .

SFX 740 N 1
SFX 740 0 ebookPut .

SFX 741 N 1
SFX 741 0 ebookPutReturnObject .

SFX 742 N 1
SFX 742 0 ebookRead .

SFX 743 N 1
SFX 743 0 ebookResetGeneratedCells .

SFX 744 N 1
SFX 744 0 ebooks .

SFX 745 N 1
SFX 745 0 ebookSave .

SFX 746 N 1
SFX 746 0 ebookSaveAs .

SFX 747 N 1
SFX 747 0 ebookSelection .

SFX 748 N 1
SFX 748 0 ebookSetupLayoutInformationPacket .

SFX 749 N 1
SFX 749 0 ebooksMenu .

SFX 750 N 1
SFX 750 0 ebookTemplate .

SFX 751 N 1
SFX 751 0 ebookWrite .

SFX 752 N 1
SFX 752 0 EC .

SFX 753 N 1
SFX 753 0 ecagon .

SFX 754 N 1
SFX 754 0 ecahedron .

SFX 755 N 1
SFX 755 0 ecanoic .

SFX 756 N 1
SFX 756 0 ecenoic .

SFX 757 N 1
SFX 757 0 ECM .

SFX 758 N 1
SFX 758 0 econd .

SFX 759 N 1
SFX 759 0 econds .

SFX 760 N 1
SFX 760 0 ECQ .

SFX 761 N 1
SFX 761 0 ectation .

SFX 762 N 1
SFX 762 0 ectationE .

SFX 763 N 1
SFX 763 0 ectedValue .

SFX 764 N 1
SFX 764 0 ed .

SFX 765 N 1
SFX 765 0 edBarChart .

SFX 766 N 1
SFX 766 0 edCells .

SFX 767 N 1
SFX 767 0 edComponents .

SFX 768 N 1
SFX 768 0 edCurve .

SFX 769 N 1
SFX 769 0 edCurveBox .

SFX 770 N 1
SFX 770 0 edCurveBoxOptions .

SFX 771 N 1
SFX 771 0 edData .

SFX 772 N 1
SFX 772 0 edDateListPlot .

SFX 773 N 1
SFX 773 0 edEmbedding .

SFX 774 N 1
SFX 774 0 Edge .

SFX 775 N 1
SFX 775 0 EdgeCover .

SFX 776 N 1
SFX 776 0 EdgeCut .

SFX 777 N 1
SFX 777 0 EdgeIndependentPaths .

SFX 778 N 1
SFX 778 0 Edges .

SFX 779 N 1
SFX 779 0 edGompertzDistribution .

SFX 780 N 1
SFX 780 0 edGraphComponents .

SFX 781 N 1
SFX 781 0 edGraphQ .

SFX 782 N 1
SFX 782 0 edGreaterGreater .

SFX 783 N 1
SFX 783 0 EditDuplicate .

SFX 784 N 1
SFX 784 0 edLessLess .

SFX 785 N 1
SFX 785 0 edListPlot .

SFX 786 N 1
SFX 786 0 edMeshComponents .

SFX 787 N 1
SFX 787 0 edMoleculeComponents .

SFX 788 N 1
SFX 788 0 edMoleculeQ .

SFX 789 N 1
SFX 789 0 edNotebook .

SFX 790 N 1
SFX 790 0 edObject .

SFX 791 N 1
SFX 791 0 eDomain .

SFX 792 N 1
SFX 792 0 edQ .

SFX 793 N 1
SFX 793 0 edResponse .

SFX 794 N 1
SFX 794 0 edResponseDelta .

SFX 795 N 1
SFX 795 0 edSlider .

SFX 796 N 1
SFX 796 0 edTreeToCode .

SFX 797 N 1
SFX 797 0 edValue .

SFX 798 N 1
SFX 798 0 eEpsilon .

SFX 799 N 1
SFX 799 0 eError .

SFX 800 N 1
SFX 800 0 EGF .

SFX 801 N 1
SFX 801 0 eID .

SFX 802 N 1
SFX 802 0 el .

SFX 803 N 1
SFX 803 0 electronvolt .

SFX 804 N 1
SFX 804 0 electronvolts .

SFX 805 N 1
SFX 805 0 Element .

SFX 806 N 1
SFX 806 0 ElementData .

SFX 807 N 1
SFX 807 0 Elements .

SFX 808 N 1
SFX 808 0 ElementsBoundingBox .

SFX 809 N 1
SFX 809 0 ElementSpacings .

SFX 810 N 1
SFX 810 0 ElementStyleOptions .

SFX 811 N 1
SFX 811 0 eller .

SFX 812 N 1
SFX 812 0 ellipse .

SFX 813 N 1
SFX 813 0 ellipses .

SFX 814 N 1
SFX 814 0 EllipticNomeQ .

SFX 815 N 1
SFX 815 0 Embedding .

SFX 816 N 1
SFX 816 0 EmbeddingDimension .

SFX 817 N 1
SFX 817 0 en .

SFX 818 N 1
SFX 818 0 Enable .

SFX 819 N 1
SFX 819 0 eName .

SFX 820 N 1
SFX 820 0 Encode .

SFX 821 N 1
SFX 821 0 Encoding .

SFX 822 N 1
SFX 822 0 EncodingsPath .

SFX 823 N 1
SFX 823 0 End .

SFX 824 N 1
SFX 824 0 EndDynamicExpression .

SFX 825 N 1
SFX 825 0 EndEventActions .

SFX 826 N 1
SFX 826 0 EndExecute .

SFX 827 N 1
SFX 827 0 EndObject .

SFX 828 N 1
SFX 828 0 endorf .

SFX 829 N 1
SFX 829 0 EndPacket .

SFX 830 N 1
SFX 830 0 EndResource .

SFX 831 N 1
SFX 831 0 EndResourceString .

SFX 832 N 1
SFX 832 0 EndsQ .

SFX 833 N 1
SFX 833 0 EndStackSize .

SFX 834 N 1
SFX 834 0 EndToken .

SFX 835 N 1
SFX 835 0 EndTokenExecute .

SFX 836 N 1
SFX 836 0 EndValueCache .

SFX 837 N 1
SFX 837 0 EndVersion .

SFX 838 N 1
SFX 838 0 ené .

SFX 839 N 1
SFX 839 0 enoid .

SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 0 ension .

SFX 841 N 1
SFX 841 0 EntersInput .

SFX 842 N 1
SFX 842 0 Entity .

SFX 843 N 1
SFX 843 0 ENU .

SFX 844 N 1
SFX 844 0 eNumberQ .

SFX 845 N 1
SFX 845 0 Environment .

SFX 846 N 1
SFX 846 0 Epilog .

SFX 847 N 1
SFX 847 0 ePrecision .

SFX 848 N 1
SFX 848 0 epresentations .

SFX 849 N 1
SFX 849 0 Equal .

SFX 850 N 1
SFX 850 0 EqualGreater .

SFX 851 N 1
SFX 851 0 EqualLess .

SFX 852 N 1
SFX 852 0 EqualThan .

SFX 853 N 1
SFX 853 0 EqualTilde .

SFX 854 N 1
SFX 854 0 EquationalProof .

SFX 855 N 1
SFX 855 0 Equations .

SFX 856 N 1
SFX 856 0 EquivalenceTest .

SFX 857 N 1
SFX 857 0 EquivalentQ .

SFX 858 N 1
SFX 858 0 er .

SFX 859 N 1
SFX 859 0 erAssignments .

SFX 860 N 1
SFX 860 0 erBox .

SFX 861 N 1
SFX 861 0 erBoxOptions .

SFX 862 N 1
SFX 862 0 erClockwiseContourIntegral .

SFX 863 N 1
SFX 863 0 erData .

SFX 864 N 1
SFX 864 0 erEvaluator .

SFX 865 N 1
SFX 865 0 Erf .

SFX 866 N 1
SFX 866 0 Erfc .

SFX 867 N 1
SFX 867 0 ergence .
