Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
Abort/764,1419,1864,2008
Animator/352,363,807
Annuity/695
antialias/764,1304
Appearance/807,1989
ArcSin/665
AsymptoticGreater/849
AsymptoticLess/849
attos/758,759,1265,1269,1270
Axes/774,1047,1433,1745,2137
Beckmann/665
Benford/665
benz/839,882
Beta/334,665
beva/803,804
Binomial/665
Carmo/701
Center/244,674
centis/758,759,1265,1269,1270,1283,1290,2258
chal/685,686
ChannelListen/858,876,881
Circle/352,674,1595,1818,1822,2222,2235
codim/840
Compress/771
Connect/767,780,781,786,787,788,792
Correlation/657,1053,1558,2199
Count/661,662,859,860,861,862,863,864
cyclid/703,1211
decempeda/703
decis/758,759,1265,1269,1270,2193,2194
Deploy/764
Div/867
EdgeWeight/781
Encrypt/790,986
Euclid/708
exas/758,759,1265,1269,1270
FactorInteger/757
Fail/764
Failure/27,665,1869
femtos/758,759,1265,1269,1270,2191,2192
Font/423,474,838,955,962,1012,1624,1732,1834,1861,1916,2076,2078,2081,2144,2272,2334,2366
Front/823,824,825,826,827,830,831,833,834,835,836,837
funt/703
Gamma/665,1924
GeoPosition/843,2389
GeoVector/843,1816,2389
gigas/171,172,758,759,1265,1269,1270
Greater/849,851,852,1051,1106,1483,2082,2212,2230
hectos/758,759,1265,1269,1270
Histogram/9,665,1510
Iconize/672
Label/764,785,795,796,1307
legua/703
Less/849,850,852,1051,1106,1483,2082,2212,2230
LinkConnect/792
LogGamma/665
Machin/791,798,799,801,819,844,847,920
megas/171,172,758,759,1265,1269,1270
Meixner/665
Method/800,1081,1734
Molecule/511,857,1095,1603,1798,1816,1817,1862,1869,2324
Most/811,2073
Multinomial/665
Multinormal/665
Nest/782,784
NetworkFlow/778
NetworkPacketRecording/699
NotLeftTriangle/309,849
NotLess/849,1051,1106,1483,2082,2230
NotPrecedes/849,2082,2230
NotRightTriangle/309,849
NotSquareSubset/849
NotSquareSuperset/849
NotSubset/849
NotSucceeds/849,2082,2230
NotSuperset/849
NotTilde/849,1051,2230
Optional/805
Order/665,792,1304,1305,1308
Pause/694
pentad/753,755,756,1994
picos/758,1265,1269,1270,2191,2192
polyhe/683
Power/665,935
Precedes/849,2082,2230
Predict/793,794,1362,1742,1747,1748,1749
prem/709,2300
preprocess/764,882,1304
Probability/665,1816,1837,2005
Product/665,1302,1527
Protect/764
Quantity/244,665,1012,1538,1869,2303,2327,2328,2329,2330,2331
Ramsey/858
Reduce/805
Return/841,944,1320,1773,1912,2206
Scale/570,668,669,670,682,958,959,1053,1588
Sech/665
semih/710
semisextula/703
semuncia/703
sescuncia/703
sextula/703
Shift/779,1922
SquareSubset/849
SquareSuperset/849
Standardize/570,684
Subset/849,1544,1869,1994
Succeeds/849,2082,2230
SumOfSquaresR/848
Superset/849
Take/479,687,1448,1449,1510,1558,1680,1979,1996,2085,2086,2297,2367
tetrad/753,754,1211,2392
Tilde/849,1051,2230
Trigg/858
Tschirnhaus/817
uncheck/764,1304,1994
uncia/703
VectorGreater/849
VectorLess/849
vendekas/758,759,1265
VertexWeight/781
Weibull/665
Weierstrass/705,706,707,891,892,893,1145,1146,1147,1148,1343,1344,1346,1770,1836,2071,2407
WindowFrame/807
Wishart/665,1560
XML/805,1690,2184
yoctos/758,759,1265,1269,1270
yottas/758,759,1265,1269,1270
Zeck/828
zeptos/758,759,1265,1269,1270
zettas/758,759,1265,1269,1270
Zipf/665
$TimeZone/842
